Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2114.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-2010, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-2010. Motorcycle safety fund; administration A. The motorcycle safety fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to subsection B of this section and monies from gifts, grants and other donations. The director of the governor's office of highway safety shall administer the fund. On notice from the director of the governor's office of highway safety, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided in section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund. Up to ten percent of the monies in the fund may be used for administrative costs. Monies in the fund are subject to legislative appropriation and are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations. B. Notwithstanding section 28-2004, the director of the department of transportation shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, $1 of each motorcycle registration fee collected pursuant to section 28-2003 in the motorcycle safety fund. C. Subject to legislative appropriation, the director of the governor's office of highway safety shall use monies deposited in the motorcycle safety fund pursuant to this section for the following purposes: 1. up to seventy-five percent to implement and support voluntary motorcycle education, awareness, training and other programs and may use the monies to cover the cost of materials for motorcycle safety, education and awareness programs. 2. Up to twenty-five percent for scholarships for motorcycle driver education programs for persons who are from rural or low-income areas in this state to increase access to motorcycle training programs. D. Any fee, assessment or other levy that is authorized by law or administrative rule and that is collected and deposited in the motorcycle safety fund shall be held in trust. The monies in the fund may be used only for the purposes prescribed by statute and may not be appropriated or transferred by the legislature to fund the general operations of this state or to otherwise meet the obligations of the general fund of this state. This subsection does not apply to any taxes or other levies that are imposed pursuant to title 42 or 43.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 28, chapter 7, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 28-2014, to read: START_STATUTE28-2014. Motorcycle registration; requirements The department may renew a REGISTRATION for a motorcycle only if at least one of the registered owners of the motorcycle is licensed to legally operate a motorcycle in this state, Except the department may issue a thirty-day temporary registration if the person shows valid proof of enrollment in a motorcycle training program approved by the department.  If the registered owner of a motorcycle is a trust, a trustee named in the trust must be legally licensed to OPERATE a motorcycle to renew a registration pursuant to this section. This section does not apply to a motorcycle that is owned by a business.END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Effective date This act is effective from and after December 31, 2026. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 22, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.